de: Bauform des Fadenschneiders: Fadenschneider (Clover-Stil); Hand-Fadenschere; Multitool (Fadenschneider + weitere Werkzeuge); Anhänger-Fadenschneider; Einziehbarer Fadenschneider; Ring-Fadenschneider; Scheren-Fadenschneider; Nahttrenner mit Fadenschneider; Tisch-Fadenschneider; Sonstige
zh-CN: 剪线器外形规格: Clover 风格割线刀; 手持纱剪; 多功能工具（割线刀 + 其他工具）; 吊坠割线刀; 可伸缩割线刀; 戒指割线刀; 剪刀式割线刀; 带割线刀的拆线器; 桌面割线刀; 其他
hr-HR: Oblik rezača konca: Rezač konca Clover; Ručne škarice za konac; Višenamjenski alat (rezač konca + ostali alati); Rezač konca kao privjesak; Uvlačivi rezač konca; Rezač konca kao prsten; Rezač konca u obliku škara; Paralica s rezačem konca; Stolni rezač konca; Ostalo
vi: Định dạng của dụng cụ cắt chỉ: Dao cắt chỉ kiểu Clover; Kéo bấm chỉ cầm tay; Dụng cụ đa năng (dao cắt chỉ + công cụ khác); Dao cắt chỉ dạng mặt dây chuyền; Dao cắt chỉ có thể rút lại; Dao cắt chỉ dạng nhẫn; Dao cắt chỉ dạng kéo; Dao rọc đường may có dao cắt chỉ; Dao cắt chỉ để bàn; Khác
hu: Szálvágó kialakítása: Clover stílusú szálvágó; Kézi szálvágó olló; Többfunkciós eszköz (szálvágó + egyéb eszközök); Medálos szálvágó; Visszahúzható szálvágó; Gyűrűs szálvágó; Olló stílusú szálvágó; Bontótű szálvágóval; Asztali szálvágó; Egyéb
nl: Vormfactor draadsnijder: Clover-stijl draadafsnijder; Draadschaartje; Multitool (draadafsnijder + andere tools); Draadafsnijderhanger; Intrekbare draadafsnijder; Draadafsnijderring; Schaar-stijl draadafsnijder; Tornmesje met draadafsnijder; Tafel-draadafsnijder; Overige
cs: Provedení odstřihovače nití: Odřezávač nití ve stylu Clover; Ruční cvakačky na nitě; Víceúčelový nástroj (odřezávač nití + další nástroje); Odřezávač nití s přívěskem; Zasouvací odřezávač nití; Odřezávač nití v prstenu; Odřezávač nití ve stylu nůžek; Páráček s odřezávačem nití; Stolní odřezávač nití; Ostatní
lt-LT: Siūlų kirpiklio formos faktorius: „Clover“ stiliaus siūlų pjoviklis; Rankinės siūlų žirklutės; Daugiafunkcis įrankis (siūlų pjoviklis ir kiti įrankiai); Pakabuko formos siūlų pjoviklis; Ištraukiamas siūlų pjoviklis; Žiedo formos siūlų pjoviklis; Žirklių stiliaus siūlų pjoviklis; Siūlių ardiklis su siūlų pjovikliu; Stalinis siūlų pjoviklis; Kitas
bg-BG: Форм фактор на резачка за конци: Резачка за конци тип Clover; Ръчна ножичка за конци; Мултитул (резачка за конци и други инструменти); Резачка за конци тип висулка; Прибираща се резачка за конци; Резачка за конци тип пръстен; Резачка за конци тип ножица; Инструмент за разпаряне с резачка за конци; Настолна резачка за конци; Друго
ro-RO: Factor de formă al tăietorului de ață: Cutter fire tip Clover; Foarfecă de mână pentru fire; Unealtă multifuncțională (tăietor de fire + alte unelte); Tăietor de fire tip pandantiv; Tăietor de fire retractabil; Tăietor de fire tip inel; Tăietor de fire tip foarfecă; Desfăcător de cusături cu tăietor de fire; Tăietor de fire pentru masă; Altele
ko: 실 커터 폼 팩터: 클로버 스타일 실 자르개; 휴대용 쪽가위; 멀티툴(실 자르개 및 기타 도구); 펜던트 실 자르개; 접이식 실 자르개; 반지형 실 자르개; 가위형 실 자르개; 실 자르개가 있는 실뜯개; 탁상형 실 자르개; 기타
zh-TW: 剪線器外型規格: Clover 風格切線器; 手持剪線鉗; 多功能工具 (切線器 + 其他工具); 吊墜切線器; 伸縮切線器; 戒指切線器; 剪刀式切線器; 附切線器的拆線刀; 桌上型切線器; 其他
nb: Trådkutters formfaktor: Trådkutter i Clover-stil; Håndholdt trådsaks; Multiverktøy (trådkutter + andre verktøy); Trådkutter som anheng; Uttrekkbar trådkutter; Trådkutter som ring; Sakseformet trådkutter; Sprettekniv med trådkutter; Bordtrådkutter; Annet
tr: İplik kesici form faktörü: Clover tarzı iplik kesici; El tipi iplik makası; Çoklu alet (iplik kesici ve diğer aletler); Kolye tipi iplik kesici; İçeri çekilebilir iplik kesici; Yüzük tipi iplik kesici; Makas tarzı iplik kesici; İplik kesicili dikiş sökücü; Masaüstü iplik kesici; Diğer
th: รูปแบบของอุปกรณ์ตัดเกลียว: ที่ตัดด้ายทรงใบโคลเวอร์; กรรไกรตัดด้ายแบบพกพา; เครื่องมืออเนกประสงค์ (ที่ตัดด้าย + เครื่องมืออื่นๆ); จี้ตัดด้าย; ที่ตัดด้ายแบบยืดหดได้; แหวนตัดด้าย; ที่ตัดด้ายทรงกรรไกร; ที่เลาะตะเข็บพร้อมที่ตัดด้าย; ที่ตัดด้ายตั้งโต๊ะ; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Formato do cortador de cabos: Cortador de linha estilo Clover; Tesoura de arremate manual; Multiferramenta (cortador de linha + outras ferramentas); Cortador de linha tipo pingente; Cortador de linha retrátil; Cortador de linha tipo anel; Cortador de linha tipo tesoura; Descosedor com cortador de linha; Cortador de linha de mesa; Outros
pt-PT: Formato do cortador de fios: Cortador de fio estilo Clover; Tesouras de fios manuais; Multiferramenta (cortador de fio e outras ferramentas); Cortador de fio pendente; Cortador de fio retrátil; Cortador de fio em anel; Cortador de fio tipo tesoura; Descosedor com cortador de fio; Cortador de fio de mesa; Outro
es: Factor de forma del cortador de hilo: Cortahilos tipo Clover; Tijeras cortahilos de mano; Multiuso (cortahilos + otras herramientas); Cortahilos colgante; Cortahilos retráctil; Cortahilos de anillo; Cortahilos tipo tijera; Descosedor con cortahilos; Cortahilos de mesa; Otro
ru: Формфактор нитеобрезателя: Резак для нитей типа Clover; Снипперы для нитей; Мультитул (резак для нитей + другие инструменты); Кулон-резак для нитей; Выдвижной резак для нитей; Кольцо-резак для нитей; Резак для нитей в виде ножниц; Вспарыватель швов с резаком для нитей; Настольный резак для нитей; Другое
sk-SK: Tvarový faktor rezačky závitov: Odrezávač nití typu Clover; Ručné cvikačky na nite; Multitool (odrezávač nití + ďalšie nástroje); Príveskový odrezávač nití; Zaťahovací odrezávač nití; Prsteňový odrezávač nití; Nožnicový odrezávač nití; Párač švov s odrezávačom nití; Stolový odrezávač nití; Iné
fi: Lankaleikkurin muototekijä: Clover-tyyppinen lankaleikkuri; Käsikäyttöiset lankasakset; Monitoimityökalu (lankaleikkuri + muita työkaluja); Riipuslankaleikkuri; Sisäänvedettävä lankaleikkuri; Sormuslankaleikkuri; Saksityyppinen lankaleikkuri; Ratkoja lankaleikkurilla; Pöytälankaleikkuri; Muu
it: Fattore di forma del tagliafilo: Tagliafilo stile Clover; Forbicine tagliafilo portatili; Strumento multiuso (tagliafilo + altri strumenti); Tagliafilo a ciondolo; Tagliafilo retrattile; Tagliafilo ad anello; Tagliafilo a forbice; Scucitore con tagliafilo; Tagliafilo da tavolo; Altro
ja: ねじ切りカッターフォームファクター: クロバースタイルスレッドカッター; 糸切りバサミ; マルチツール (スレッドカッター + その他のツール); ペンダントスレッドカッター; リトラクタブルスレッドカッター; リングスレッドカッター; ハサミ型スレッドカッター; スレッドカッター付きシームリッパー; 卓上スレッドカッター; その他
el: συντελεστής μορφής κοπτικού νήματος: Κόφτης νημάτων τύπου Clover; Κόφτες νημάτων χειρός; Πολυεργαλείο (κόφτης νημάτων + άλλα εργαλεία); Κόφτης νημάτων μενταγιόν; Αναδιπλούμενος κόφτης νημάτων; Κόφτης νημάτων δαχτυλίδι; Κόφτης νημάτων τύπου ψαλιδιού; Ξηλωτήρι με κόφτη νημάτων; Επιτραπέζιος κόφτης νημάτων; Άλλο
da: Formfaktor for trådklipper: Trådafskærer i Clover-stil; Håndholdt trådsaks; Multiværktøj (trådafskærer og andre værktøjer); Trådafskærer som vedhæng; Indtrækbar trådafskærer; Trådafskærer som ring; Trådafskærer i sakseformat; Opsprætter med trådafskærer; Bordtrådafskærer; Andet
sl-SI: Oblika rezila za sukanec: Rezalnik niti v slogu Clover; Ročne škarjice za nit; Večnamensko orodje (rezalnik niti in druga orodja); Obesek z rezalnikom niti; Zložljiv rezalnik niti; Prstan z rezalnikom niti; Rezalnik niti v slogu škarij; Paralnik šivov z rezalnikom niti; Namizni rezalnik niti; Drugo
sv: Trådskärarens utformning: Trådskärare av Clover-typ; Handhållen trådsax; Multiverktyg (trådskärare och andra verktyg); Trådskärare som hänge; Infällbar trådskärare; Trådskärare som ring; Trådskärare av saxtyp; Sprättare med trådskärare; Bordsplacerad trådskärare; Annat
fr: Format du coupe-fil: Coupe-fil style Clover; Coupe-fil manuel; Multifonction (coupe-fil + autres outils); Pendentif coupe-fil; Coupe-fil rétractable; Bague coupe-fil; Coupe-fil style ciseaux; Découseur avec coupe-fil; Coupe-fil de table; Autre
pl: Forma obcinacza nici: Obcinaczka do nici w stylu Clover; Ręczne nożyczki do nici; Narzędzie wielofunkcyjne (obcinaczka do nici + inne narzędzia); Zawieszka z obcinaczką do nici; Wysuwana obcinaczka do nici; Pierścień z obcinaczką do nici; Obcinaczka do nici typu nożyczki; Prujka z obcinaczką do nici; Stołowa obcinaczka do nici; Inne
en: Thread cutter form factor: Clover-style thread cutter; Handheld thread snips; Multi-tool (thread cutter + other tools); Pendant thread cutter; Retractable thread cutter; Ring thread cutter; Scissor-style thread cutter; Seam ripper with thread cutter; Tabletop thread cutter; Other